Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.150

Designation of parties—Fees.

In all proceedings under this chapter the school district seeking to acquire title to real estate for a schoolhouse site, shall be denominated plaintiff, and all other persons interested therein shall be denominated defendants; and in all such proceedings the clerk of the superior court wherein any such proceeding is brought shall charge nothing for his or her services, except in taking an appeal from the judgment entered in the superior court.

[ 2011 c 336 s 276; 1909 p 375 s 15; 1903 c 111 s 15; RRS s 920.]